Mississippi statutes. Title 79. Corporations, Associations, and Partnerships
Subarticle A. Certificate of Authority.
Federal district court dismissed, on grounds of res judicata, the claims of a foreign corporation, even though the prior dismissal of its claims by a State court had been erroneous where the corporation had not been authorized to do business at that time under Miss. Code Ann. § 79-4-15.02(a), but the State court should have stayed the proceedings under Miss. Code Ann. § 79-4-15.02(c). Cuba Timber Co., Plaintiff v. Boswell, 339 F. Supp. 2d 773, 2004 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 20289 (S.D. Miss. 2004).

If a foreign corporation is not transacting business in Mississippi, a certificate of authority is not required in order to maintain an action in Mississippi, as demonstrated by § 79-4-15.02(c) which states that a court may stay a proceeding commenced by a foreign corporation until it determines whether the corporation requires a certificate of authority; since the court is granted some amount of discretion, it is apparent that not all foreign corporations require a certificate to maintain an action. Mississippi Ins. Guar. Ass'n v. Harkins & Co., 652 So. 2d 732, 1995 Miss. LEXIS 145 (Miss. 1995).

A foreign corporation was not transacting business in Mississippi, and therefore did not need a certificate of authority in order to maintain an action in Mississippi where the only business contact the corporation had with Mississippi was the actual commencement of the suit, since § 79-4-15.01(b)(1) states that simply maintaining, defending, or settling a proceeding does not constitute “transacting business.” Mississippi Ins. Guar. Ass'n v. Harkins & Co., 652 So. 2d 732, 1995 Miss. LEXIS 145 (Miss. 1995).

Foreign corporation was barred from maintaining an action against a departing lawyer where it never obtained a certificate of authority to transact business in Mississippi as required by Miss. Code Ann. § 79-4-15.01(a) (Rev. 2013), and its actions in signing up clients in Mississippi, filing lawsuits and pleadings in Mississippi courts, and entering into employment contracts with Mississippi lawyers constituted transacting business in the state. Fulgham v. Morgan & Morgan, PLLC, — So.3d —, 2019 Miss. App. LEXIS 615 (Miss. Ct. App. Dec. 17, 2019).

Mississippi’s closing-door statute, Miss. Code Ann. § 79-4-15.02(a), did not foreclose the bank from enforcement of the notes and deeds of trust it assumed from a mortgage company because the mortgage company did not need a certificate of authority to enter into the mortgage transactions with the homeowners. Furthermore, the statute did not apply because the bank was merely defending the lawsuit brought by the homeowners. Carson v. McNeal, 375 F. Supp. 2d 509, 2005 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 13166 (S.D. Miss. 2005).

Federal district court dismissed, on grounds of res judicata, the claims of a foreign corporation, even though the prior dismissal of its claims by a State court had been erroneous where the corporation had not been authorized to do business at that time under Miss. Code Ann. § 79-4-15.02(a), but the State court should have stayed the proceedings under Miss. Code Ann. § 79-4-15.02(c). Cuba Timber Co., Plaintiff v. Boswell, 339 F. Supp. 2d 773, 2004 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 20289 (S.D. Miss. 2004).

If a foreign corporation is not transacting business in Mississippi, a certificate of authority is not required in order to maintain an action in Mississippi, as demonstrated by § 79-4-15.02(c) which states that a court may stay a proceeding commenced by a foreign corporation until it determines whether the corporation requires a certificate of authority; since the court is granted some amount of discretion, it is apparent that not all foreign corporations require a certificate to maintain an action. Mississippi Ins. Guar. Ass'n v. Harkins & Co., 652 So. 2d 732, 1995 Miss. LEXIS 145 (Miss. 1995).

A foreign corporation was not transacting business in Mississippi, and therefore did not need a certificate of authority in order to maintain an action in Mississippi where the only business contact the corporation had with Mississippi was the actual commencement of the suit, since § 79-4-15.01(b)(1) states that simply maintaining, defending, or settling a proceeding does not constitute “transacting business.” Mississippi Ins. Guar. Ass'n v. Harkins & Co., 652 So. 2d 732, 1995 Miss. LEXIS 145 (Miss. 1995).

If corporation does not qualify to do business in State of Mississippi, it does not have access to courts in so far as maintaining action or suit. Read v. Sonat Offshore Drilling, Inc., 515 So. 2d 1229, 1987 Miss. LEXIS 2929 (Miss. 1987).

If foreign corporation is qualified to do business in State of Mississippi, even though it may not be doing any business, its agent for process may be served and courts have personal jurisdiction over that corporation; actually doing business in state has nothing to do with personal jurisdiction where foreign corporation has qualified to do business in state; corporation qualifying to do business in state, under appropriate statutes, becomes like individual as far as suit is concerned. Read v. Sonat Offshore Drilling, Inc., 515 So. 2d 1229, 1987 Miss. LEXIS 2929 (Miss. 1987).

In a diversity action by a Florida construction company in federal district court for Mississippi, seeking to recover a construction contract debt from the surety, a Mississippi bank, the trial court committed reversible error when it granted the bank’s motion for dismissal on the grounds that the foreign company had engaged in intrastate commerce without qualifying to do so as required by Mississippi law, and thus, was precluded from maintaining an action in Mississippi state or federal court, where contract substantially related to interstate activities, where, under the National Bank Act, the bank was required to be sued where it was located, and where it would have been an impermissible burden on interstate commerce to permit Mississippi courtroom doors to remain closed to such foreign company on events and contracts substantially related to interstate activities. Diversacon Industries, Inc. v. National Bank of Commerce, 629 F.2d 1030, 1980 U.S. App. LEXIS 12640 (5th Cir. Miss. 1980).

Statute prohibiting a foreign corporation which does not obtain from Mississippi’s secretary of state a certificate of authority to transact business in the state from maintaining an action in any courts in Mississippi does not deprive a defendant of the right to prevent compulsory counterclaims and third-party complaints. Environmental Coatings, Inc. v. Baltimore Paint & Chemical Co., 617 F.2d 110, 1980 U.S. App. LEXIS 17512 (5th Cir. Miss. 1980).

Where, at the time a foreign corporation entered into a contract with a franchisee, it was not authorized to do business within the state, but where it had qualified to transact business within the state by the time the cause of action for default in the payment of the franchise fees accrued, the foreign corporation was entitled to bring suit in state court to enforce its contract with its franchisee. Honey Fluff Donut Co. v. Daniel, Inc., 374 So. 2d 800, 1979 Miss. LEXIS 2363 (Miss. 1979).

Payment of the contractor’s privilege tax by a foreign corporation did not relieve it of the requirement that it obtain a certificate of authority to do business from the secretary of state and, absent such certificate, the contractor was not entitled to sue in state court to enforce a construction lien. Town & Country Plumbing Co. v. Delta Real Estate Development, Inc., 357 So. 2d 126, 1978 Miss. LEXIS 2491 (Miss. 1978).

Because it was engaged as well in intrastate business, the general interstate nature of the business of a multistate franchising corporation did not exempt it from the requirement of this section that it obtain a certificate to operate within the state; and a Mississippi franchisee against whom it filed suit to recover franchise fees and other charges was not estopped, by his filing of a counterclaim, from raising this statute as a bar to the corporation’s action, where the corporation had incorrectly alleged in its complaint that it was licensed and qualified in Mississippi, and the franchisee properly relied on the pleading by filing a responsive pleading. Barbee v. United Dollar Stores, Inc., 337 So. 2d 1277, 1976 Miss. LEXIS 1617 (Miss. 1976).

Statute did not apply to a national banking corporation. Indiana Nat'l Bank v. Roberts, 326 So. 2d 802, 1976 Miss. LEXIS 1764 (Miss. 1976).

Chancellor was correct in overruling a motion to dismiss under Code 1972, § 79-3-247 [Repealed] where there was nothing in the record to indicate that the complainant was doing, or had been doing, business in Mississippi. Crescent Plywood Co. v. Lawrence, 305 So. 2d 343, 1974 Miss. LEXIS 1477 (Miss. 1974).

The Mississippi Supreme Court’s judgment holding that because of an out-of-state cotton merchant’s failure to obtain a certificate of authority to qualify to do business in the state as a foreign corporation, the merchant, pursuant to Code 1942, § 5309-239, could not maintain an action in the state courts against a resident cotton farmer for his breach of a contract to sell his future cotton crop to the merchant by delivering the cotton to the merchant at a local warehouse-such contract having been negotiated by an independent, local broker whose practice was to telephone the necessary information to the merchant at its out-of-state office, where a contract was prepared and signed by the merchant and then forwarded to the broker to obtain the farmer’s signature-is repugnant to the commerce clause of the Federal Constitution (Art I, § 8, cl 3), where (1) even though delivery of the cotton to the merchant’s account at the local warehouse, taken in isolation, was an intrastate transaction, nevertheless such delivery was a part of interstate commerce since it was essential for sorting and classifying the cotton as a prerequisite to its shipment in interstate or foreign commerce under the merchant’s contracts for sale of the cotton to customers outside the state, and (2) the merchant’s contracts with the forum state did not exhibit the sort of localization or intrastate character required in situations where a state seeks to require a foreign corporation to qualify to do business, since the local broker who arranged the contracts was paid on a commission basis and had no authority to execute contracts on the merchant’s behalf, and since the merchant had no office or warehouse in the state, and no employees soliciting business or otherwise operating in the state on a regular basis. Allenberg Cotton Co. v. Pittman, 419 U.S. 20, 95 S. Ct. 260, 42 L. Ed. 2d 195, 1974 U.S. LEXIS 11 (U.S. 1974).

Mississippi Supreme Court’s holding that because of Tennessee cotton merchant’s failure to qualify to do business in Mississippi, merchant could not maintain action for Mississippi resident’s breach of contract to sell cotton to merchant, held violative of commerce clause of Federal Constitution. Allenberg Cotton Co. v. Pittman, 419 U.S. 20, 95 S. Ct. 260, 42 L. Ed. 2d 195, 1974 U.S. LEXIS 11 (U.S. 1974).

The phrase “in any court of this state” as used in Code 1942 § 5309-239, precludes an unqualified corporation’s resort, not only to Mississippi state courts but also to federal courts in Mississippi, with regard to actions arising out of purely intrastate activities. Fred Hale Machinery, Inc. v. Laurel Hill Lumber Co., 483 F.2d 58, 1973 U.S. App. LEXIS 8921 (5th Cir. Miss. 1973).

A statute such as Code 1942 § 5309-239 cannot be enforced if its application would unreasonably burden interstate commerce by prohibiting suits growing out of transactions in interstate commerce. Fred Hale Machinery, Inc. v. Laurel Hill Lumber Co., 483 F.2d 58, 1973 U.S. App. LEXIS 8921 (5th Cir. Miss. 1973).

Where negotiations for the design and supply of certain sawmill machinery were conducted in Louisiana and Mississippi, the Louisiana corporation arranged to supply components from manufacturers in Mississippi and Georgia, and the Louisiana corporation sent its employees to Mississippi in connection with the assembly and installation of the system, this transaction was of an interstate character, and application of Code 1942 § 5309-239 would create an unreasonable burden on interstate commerce, and accordingly, that section did not bar the Louisiana corporation from filing suit in Fred Hale Machinery, Inc. v. Laurel Hill Lumber Co., 483 F.2d 58, 1973 U.S. App. LEXIS 8921 (5th Cir. Miss. 1973).

Foreign corporation seeking to maintain action for breach of contract was not barred under
Miss Code § 79-3-247 [repealed] from bringing action for failure to have certificate of authority to do business in state where foreign corporation maintained no office or bank account in state and had no employees in state and where purpose of contract was for foreign corporation to manage hotel, thus bringing business within reach of Commerce Clause and within exception to definition of “transacting business” under § 79-3-211 [repealed].
Madden Management, Inc. v. First Equities Corp., 666 F. Supp. 96, 1987 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 7872 (N.D. Miss. 1987).

A foreign corporation transacting business in Mississippi without having first obtained a certificate of authority, as required by statute, would not be precluded from asserting a third-party complaint in an action in which it was a defendant. Park v. Cannco Contractors, Inc., 446 F. Supp. 24, 1977 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 13861 (N.D. Miss. 1977).

An Ohio corporation that had acted as purchaser and lessor of frozen drink machines, buying them from a Georgia corporation and leasing them to individuals in Mississippi who had agreed to lease them in an arrangement made through the Georgia corporation, was not “transacting” business within Mississippi within the meaning of § 79-3-247 [repealed] and could bring an action in the Mississippi district court to recover amounts due on the lease from the lessees. Xyoquip, Inc. v. Mims, 413 F. Supp. 962, 1976 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 17295 (N.D. Miss. 1976).

Diversity action brought by nonresident plaintiffs to recover a brokerage fee allegedly owed by the defendant for two loan commitments was not barred by Code 1972 § 79-3-247 [repealed] where the transactions involved fell within the exception found in Code 1972 § 79-3-211(e) [repealed]. Ivor B. Clark Co. v. Southern Business & Industrial Development Co., 399 F. Supp. 824, 1974 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 6123 (S.D. Miss. 1974).

A foreign corporation not authorized by statute to do business in Mississippi cannot resort either to the state or to the federal court sitting within the state to enforce its rights unless they arose from and were exempted as a transaction in interstate commerce. Cone Mills Corp. v. Hurdle, 369 F. Supp. 426, 1974 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 12865 (N.D. Miss. 1974).

When the plaintiff nonresident corporation ceased to do business in this state, it was no longer in violation of the law requiring it to obtain a certificate of authority, and a cause of action thereafter accruing which did not arise directly out of the operation of the business could be maintained in the courts of this state. Val--U--King Homes, Inc. v. Taylor, 301 So. 2d 857, 1974 Miss. LEXIS 1676 (Miss. 1974).

In a suit filed by a foreign corporation having no certificate of authority to do business in this state, where the record showed that the only business that the plaintiff had transacted in this state was entering into the lease contract with the defendant which was the subject of the suit, the transaction sued upon fell within the exception set up in Code 1972, § 79-3-211(d)[Repealed], and the plaintiff was therefore not barred from bringing suit by Code 1972, § 79-3-247 [repealed]. Mid--Continent Refrigerator Co. v. Starks, 298 So. 2d 714, 1974 Miss. LEXIS 1572 (Miss. 1974).

Where a joint venturer consisted of three foreign corporations, the joint venturer could not maintain an action in negligence for damages where one of the corporations had failed to qualify to do business in Mississippi, even though the connection of such corporation with the transaction consisted only in furnishing its share of the capital needed to carry out the contract in the state and the actual performance of the contract was accomplished by another of the joint venturers. Scott Co. of California v. Enco Constr. Co., 264 So. 2d 409, 1972 Miss. LEXIS 1362 (Miss. 1972).

For the purposes of Code 1942, § 5309-239, providing that a foreign corporation transacting business in Mississippi without a certificate of authority shall not be permitted to maintain any action, a member of a joint venturer is transacting business in the state when one of the joint venturers is transacting in the state the business for which the joint venturer was formed. Scott Co. of California v. Enco Constr. Co., 264 So. 2d 409, 1972 Miss. LEXIS 1362 (Miss. 1972).

A strict construction of this statute is required, it being penal, before access to the state courts is precluded to a foreign corporation found to be “doing business” in the state, and the question of whether a foreign corporation is doing business within the state must be determined upon an ad hoc basis. S & A Realty Co. v. Hilburn, 249 So. 2d 379, 1971 Miss. LEXIS 1159 (Miss. 1971).

Where a foreign corporation had a 10 year lease within the state and subsequently renewed for an additional 10 years, paid the agreed rentals under both the initial and renewal leases, and proposed to execute a purchase option provided therein, and where the charter of the corporation provided that the corporation’s purpose was to buy, sell, lease, exchange, build and construct real estate, the corporation was transacting business within this section [Code 1942, § 5309-239], barring it from the courts because not qualified to do so. S & A Realty Co. v. Hilburn, 249 So. 2d 379, 1971 Miss. LEXIS 1159 (Miss. 1971).

Code 1942, § 5309-239, prohibiting foreign corporations lacking a certificate of authority to maintain any action, suit or proceeding in the state, is a punitive statute designed to penalize those foreign corporations doing business in the State of Mississippi without qualifying as required by Code 1942, § 5309-221. Alabama Live Poultry, Inc. v. Ervin, 246 So. 2d 915, 1971 Miss. LEXIS 1429 (Miss. 1971).

An Alabama corporation which had never received a license or authorization to do business in Mississippi, and which leased trucks for the purpose of hauling chickens in its trucking business, purchasing the chickens in Mississippi and delivering them to a Mississippi destination, was doing business in Mississippi and could not maintain an attachment suit against the owner of the trucks, under the provisions of this section [Code 1942, § 5309-239]. Alabama Live Poultry, Inc. v. Ervin, 246 So. 2d 915, 1971 Miss. LEXIS 1429 (Miss. 1971).

Where the evidence established that the foreign corporation plaintiff was a corporate entity separate and apart from a subsidiary which engaged in business in Mississippi without authority, the association between plaintiff and its subsidiary did not create the relationship of principal and agent between them, and that plaintiff was not engaged in doing business in Mississippi through the activities of its subsidiary, it was not prohibited from bringing a diversity action in the federal courts of that state. Bunge Corp. v. St. Louis Terminal Field Warehouse Co., 295 F. Supp. 1231, 1969 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 12581 (N.D. Miss. 1969).

A foreign corporation doing business in Mississippi without having qualified as required by statute cannot use the courts of the state to enforce any cause of action that accrued as a result of doing such business, and the fact that the corporation subsequently qualified to do business would not authorize it thereafter to maintain an action on the cause which had previously accrued. Bunge Corp. v. St. Louis Terminal Field Warehouse Co., 295 F. Supp. 1231, 1969 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 12581 (N.D. Miss. 1969).

The prohibition against a foreign corporation transacting business in Mississippi without a certificate of authority maintaining an action, suit, or proceeding in any court of the state applies to an action in a federal court in the state. Bunge Corp. v. St. Louis Terminal Field Warehouse Co., 295 F. Supp. 1231, 1969 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 12581 (N.D. Miss. 1969).

The penalty imposed against a foreign corporation doing business in Mississippi without having first qualified is that it shall not be permitted to avail itself of the state courts to enforce a cause of action accruing to it prior to the time it qualified to do business; but the contracts and other acts of a foreign corporation entered into or performed prior to its qualification are not rendered invalid. Wood v. Gulf States Capital Corp., 217 So. 2d 257, 1968 Miss. LEXIS 1259 (Miss. 1968).

A corporation is doing business for purposes of requiring it to qualify to have access to the courts of Mississippi when the corporation enters the state and carries on a substantial part of its business there on a regular basis, and the question of whether a corporation is so doing business in the state is one of the facts to be determined by the circumstances of each particular case, and the corporation’s activities must be judged as a whole. Humboldt Foods, Inc. v. Massey, 297 F. Supp. 236, 1968 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 7941 (N.D. Miss. 1968).

A corporation is not doing business in Mississippi merely because it has employees or agents in the state to solicit orders to be transmitted to the principal, or to perform acts incidental to interstate commerce. Humboldt Foods, Inc. v. Massey, 297 F. Supp. 236, 1968 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 7941 (N.D. Miss. 1968).

A Tennessee food processing corporation, which entered into a contract with five Mississippi planters under which the latter agreed to cultivate 1000 acres of green beans and the processor obligated itself to harvest and transport the beans, was not engaged in doing business in Mississippi, and was not prohibited from maintaining an action in federal court in that state, although not qualified to do business there. Humboldt Foods, Inc. v. Massey, 297 F. Supp. 236, 1968 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 7941 (N.D. Miss. 1968).

A foreign corporation doing business in Mississippi without having qualified as required by statute cannot use the courts of this state to enforce any cause of action that accrued as the result of doing such business, and in order to avail itself of the state courts to enforce a cause of action, a foreign corporation doing business in the state must have qualified to do business when the cause of action accrued. Parker v. Lin-Co Producing Co., 197 So. 2d 228, 1967 Miss. LEXIS 1515 (Miss. 1967).

Effect of execution of foreign corporation’s contract which, while executory, was unenforceable because of noncompliance with conditions of doing business in state. 7 A.L.R.2d 256.

Rights of assignee or subsequent holder of negotiable paper executed to a foreign corporation doing business in state without compliance with local requirements. 80 A.L.R.2d 465.

Right to protection of corporate name, as between domestic corporation and foreign corporation not qualified to do business in state.
26 A.L.R.3d 994.

Foreign corporation’s leasing of personal property as doing business within statutes prescribing conditions of right to do business.
50 A.L.R.3d 1020.

Construction work by foreign corporation as doing business for purposes of statute requiring foreign corporation to qualify as condition of access to local courts.
90 A.L.R.3d 937.

State regulation of land ownership by alien corporation.
21 A.L.R.4th 1329.

Personal liability of stockholder, officer, or agent for debt of foreign corporation doing business in the state.
27 A.L.R.4th 387.

What constitutes doing business within state for purposes of state “closed door” statute barring unqualified or unregistered foreign corporation from local courts – modern cases.
88 A.L.R.4th 466.

Application of statute denying access to courts or invalidating contracts where corporation fails to comply with regulatory statute as affected by compliance after commencement of action.
23 A.L.R.5th 744.

36 Am. Jur. 2d, Foreign Corporations §§ 225, 230 et seq.

12 Am. Jur. Pl & Pr Forms (Rev), Foreign Corporations, Forms 31-35.

20 C.J.S., Corporations §§ 1843-1867.

Symposium on Mississippi Rules of Civil Procedure: Joinder of claims and parties-Rules 13, 14, 17 and 18. 52 Miss. L. J. 37.

An analysis of Mississippi’s treatment of foreign corporations.
55 Miss. L. J. 259, June, 1985.

§79-4-15.03.
Application for certificate of authority.

A foreign corporation may apply for a certificate of authority to transact business in this state by delivering an application to the Secretary of State for filing. The application must set forth:

The name of the foreign corporation or, if its name is unavailable for use in this state, a corporate name that satisfies the requirements of Section 79-4-15.06;

The name of the state or country under whose law it is incorporated;

Its date of incorporation and period of duration;

The street address of its principal office;

The information required by Section 79-35-5(a); and

The names and usual business addresses of its current directors and officers.

The foreign corporation shall deliver with the completed application a certificate of existence (or a document of similar import) duly authenticated by the Secretary of State or other official having custody of corporate records in the state or country under whose law it is incorporated.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 486, § 15.03; Laws, 2012, ch. 382, § 41, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2013.

The 2012 amendment, effective January 1, 2013, rewrote (a)(5).

Requirements of this section for obtaining original certificate of authority apply to obtaining amended certificate, see § 79-4-15.04.

Application of foreign professional corporation for certificate of authority to contain information required by this section, see § 79-10-93.

Foreign corporations, certificate of authority to transact business in state, corporate name, etc., under Mississippi Nonprofit Corporation Act, see §§ 79-11-363 through 79-11-381.

A foreign corporation transacting business in Mississippi without having first obtained a certificate of authority, as required by statute, would not be precluded from asserting a third-party complaint in an action in which it was a defendant. Park v. Cannco Contractors, Inc., 446 F. Supp. 24, 1977 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 13861 (N.D. Miss. 1977).

A non-profit foreign corporation, operating a university in another state, which leased a farm which it owned in this state, was not required to file a copy of its charter or articles of incorporation in the office of the secretary of state under this section [Code 1942, § 5343]. Gillentine v. Illinois Wesleyan University, 194 F.2d 970, 1952 U.S. App. LEXIS 3708 (5th Cir. Miss. 1952).

Execution of a mineral lease in Mississippi covering land located in Mississippi, which contract was to be performed in Mississippi, constituted doing business within that state by a foreign corporation. Calcote v. Texas Pac. Coal & Oil Co., 157 F.2d 216, 1946 U.S. App. LEXIS 3285 (5th Cir. Miss.), cert. denied, 329 U.S. 782, 67 S. Ct. 205, 91 L. Ed. 671, 1946 U.S. LEXIS 1740 (U.S. 1946).

The usual test of whether a foreign corporation is doing business within the meaning of the statutes is whether or not it is doing such acts as are within the function of its corporate powers, and where the business so performed is substantial in scope such corporation is held to be doing business. Newell Contracting Co. v. State Highway Com., 195 Miss. 395, 15 So. 2d 700, 1943 Miss. LEXIS 172 (Miss. 1943).

Foreign corporation, engaged in doing highway construction as its chief corporate function, was doing business in the state in the performance of a contract with the state highway commission for the construction of a link of state highway, within the purview of statutes requiring it to file a copy of its charter and designate an agent for the service of process. Newell Contracting Co. v. State Highway Com., 195 Miss. 395, 15 So. 2d 700, 1943 Miss. LEXIS 172 (Miss. 1943).

Performance of contract between foreign highway construction corporation and state highway commission for construction of a link of highway within state was not an isolated transaction within the rule that an isolated dealing within the state by a foreign corporation is not doing business in the state so as to require filing of copy of charter and designation of agent for service of process. Newell Contracting Co. v. State Highway Com., 195 Miss. 395, 15 So. 2d 700, 1943 Miss. LEXIS 172 (Miss. 1943).

Permitting highway commission, in suit against it by foreign corporation to recover for damages for delay and additional compensation for extra work under contract with commission for construction of highway in state, to set up defense that corporation failed to qualify as a foreign corporation doing business in the state, after suit had been pending for three years and complainant had taken testimony for 20 days and rested, was not error, in absence of a showing that commission had notice of the noncompliance with the statutes prior to the taking of the evidence. Newell Contracting Co. v. State Highway Com., 195 Miss. 395, 15 So. 2d 700, 1943 Miss. LEXIS 172 (Miss. 1943).

Foreign corporation doing business in state in performance of contract with highway commission for construction of highway could not recover damages for delay occasioned by commission nor additional compensation for extra work performed under such contract during time it failed to comply with provision requiring filing of a copy of its charter and designation of an agent for service of process. Newell Contracting Co. v. State Highway Com., 195 Miss. 395, 15 So. 2d 700, 1943 Miss. LEXIS 172 (Miss. 1943).

A foreign finance company was subject to the privilege tax imposed by Laws 1940, Ch. 110 on the business of acquiring notes and other securities whereby title is retained until payment of the purchase price of tangible personal property sold on installment payment contracts and the like, notwithstanding that such company did not file its corporate charter nor qualify to do business within the meaning of section 5319. Stone v. General Electric Contracts Corp., 193 Miss. 317, 7 So. 2d 811, 1942 Miss. LEXIS 84 (Miss. 1942), limited, Lincoln Nat'l Life Ins. Co. v. State Tax Com., 196 Miss. 82, 16 So. 2d 369, 1944 Miss. LEXIS 170 (Miss. 1944).

Where the sale of phonograph instruments to Mississippi residents by an Illinois corporation, which had no resident agent and had not filed a copy of its charter, was made through a Texas distributor, and was interstate in character, the fact that the distributor, who was compensated by a sales commission, had some sort of an understanding with the purchasers that the instrument would be kept in repair by the distributor, and the distributor did from time to time render this service, did not operate to take away the interstate character of the sale so as to preclude the corporation from foreclosing a chattel mortgage on the instrument. Smith v. J. P. Seeburg Corp., 192 Miss. 563, 6 So. 2d 591, 1942 Miss. LEXIS 44 (Miss. 1942).

This section [Code 1942, § 5343] is applicable only to corporations doing intrastate business. Morrison v. Guaranty Mortg. & Trust Co., 191 Miss. 207, 199 So. 110, 1940 Miss. LEXIS 256 (Miss. 1940).

The fact that local correspondents, who received and transmitted applications for loans to a foreign loan corporation, were or were not agents of the corporation, rather than of the borrower, was immaterial in determining that the corporation was not doing business within the state, and so was not subject to the requirement as to filing a copy of its charter and appointing an agent to receive service of process. Morrison v. Guaranty Mortg. & Trust Co., 191 Miss. 207, 199 So. 110, 1940 Miss. LEXIS 256 (Miss. 1940).

A foreign corporation was not doing business in Mississippi within the meaning of the statute, where it appeared that it was engaged in the business of procuring loans, its local agent sending the applications to the corporation’s home office for examination, and acceptance or rejection, and, if accepted, the transaction in connection with the loan was conducted through the home office, and the corporation required the borrower to pay its commission for handling the loan at the home office, or to execute notes payable to it in the city in which its home office was located. Morrison v. Guaranty Mortg. & Trust Co., 191 Miss. 207, 199 So. 110, 1940 Miss. LEXIS 256 (Miss. 1940).

In an action on a note by a foreign corporation, in which the defendant pleaded abatement on the ground that the plaintiff had not filed a copy of its charter or appointed an agent to receive service of process, the requirement of interrogatories propounded by the defendant as to all transactions of the corporation within the state from 1923 to 1931 would impose such a burden upon the right to sue as practically to defeat it, and so would not be done, where it appeared that many of the transactions had no relation to the suit before the court and so were irrelevant, there was no index to the plaintiff’s files, which were stored in such a manner that it was practically impossible to go through them, and the defendant had not accepted an offer to give them access to the files. Morrison v. Guaranty Mortg. & Trust Co., 191 Miss. 207, 199 So. 110, 1940 Miss. LEXIS 256 (Miss. 1940).

A foreign corporation, executing a contract in Minnesota for the sale of goods at wholesale, to be sold by the other party thereto in Mississippi, which contract required the purchaser to report his sale to the corporation, to designate his sales territory, and to remit a percentage of the proceeds of such sale, and permitted him to return unsold goods, was not doing business in Mississippi so as to require it to file a copy of its charter with the secretary of state and to appoint such officer as its process agent, and so as to preclude its resort to the court for failure to comply with such requirement, such contract being a contract of sale and not a contract of agency. Watson v. J. R. Watkins Co., 188 Miss. 435, 193 So. 913, 1940 Miss. LEXIS 17 (Miss. 1940).

However, an undertaking by a foreign corporation in connection with a conditional sale of an ice cream dispenser, otherwise an interstate transaction, to service it gratis for a year, gives the transaction a local character, rendering the contract of conditional sale unenforceable by reason of the corporation’s failure to comply with the requirement of this section [Code 1942, § 5343] with regard to filing a copy of its charter in order to do business in the state. Case v. Mills Novelty Co., 187 Miss. 673, 193 So. 625, 1940 Miss. LEXIS 237 (Miss. 1940).

Where a foreign corporation fails to file a copy of its charter, a contract by which an intrastate sale was made by it is void. Case v. Mills Novelty Co., 187 Miss. 673, 193 So. 625, 1940 Miss. LEXIS 237 (Miss. 1940).

Under statute (Laws 1934, Ch. 121), imposing franchise tax on corporations “doing business” in the state, which was defined to include each and every act, power or privilege exercised or enjoyed in the state as an incident to or by virtue of the powers and privileges acquired by the nature of the organization, a foreign corporation is “doing business” in the state and is subject to tax as soon as it gets ready to be active by having property there and enjoying the protection of the state for it, and qualifies formally by filing its charter and naming its agent for the service of process. Stone v. Interstate Natural Gas Co., 103 F.2d 544, 1939 U.S. App. LEXIS 3610 (5th Cir. Miss.), aff'd, 308 U.S. 522, 60 S. Ct. 292, 84 L. Ed. 442, 1939 U.S. LEXIS 16 (U.S. 1939).

Foreign corporation purchasing commercial paper secured by trust deeds in state, and collecting notes and foreclosing trust deeds by agent in state, who leased property pending foreclosures to realize on mortgages, held not “doing business in state.” North American Mortg. Co. v. Hudson, 176 Miss. 266, 168 So. 79, 1936 Miss. LEXIS 120 (Miss. 1936).

Contract for purchase of property sold on foreclosure under deed of trust which had been executed to foreign corporation not having filed its charter with state, held not void as to third persons purchasing property. Citizens' Bank of Hattiesburg v. Grigsby, 170 Miss. 655, 155 So. 684, 1934 Miss. LEXIS 181 (Miss. 1934).

Foreign corporation soliciting subscriptions within state, with intention of thereafter constructing canning factory, was doing business within state. Peterman Constr. & Supply Co. v. Blumenfeld, 156 Miss. 55, 125 So. 548, 1930 Miss. LEXIS 142 (Miss. 1930).

Foreign corporation’s compliance with law cannot as respects particular contract, be made to relate back to date of its execution. Peterman Constr. & Supply Co. v. Blumenfeld, 156 Miss. 55, 125 So. 548, 1930 Miss. LEXIS 142 (Miss. 1930).

Test whether foreign corporation is doing business within state is whether it is doing acts within function of corporate powers. Peterman Constr. & Supply Co. v. Blumenfeld, 156 Miss. 55, 125 So. 548, 1930 Miss. LEXIS 142 (Miss. 1930).

That foreign corporation did business in state without filing charter held not to prevent it from selling property in state to liquidate its affairs; this section [Code 1942, § 5343] only denies corporation the right to enforce rights growing out of business transacted contrary to statute. Long Beach Canning Co. v. Clark, 141 Miss. 177, 106 So. 646, 1926 Miss. LEXIS 439 (Miss. 1926); Harleston v. West Louisiana Bank, 129 Miss. 111, 91 So. 423, 1922 Miss. LEXIS 6 (Miss. 1922).

Foreign corporation not required to file copy of charter to sell property in this state; sale by foreign corporation of specific property in state held not doing business therein. Long Beach Canning Co. v. Clark, 141 Miss. 177, 106 So. 646, 1926 Miss. LEXIS 439 (Miss. 1926); Harleston v. West Louisiana Bank, 129 Miss. 111, 91 So. 423, 1922 Miss. LEXIS 6 (Miss. 1922).

Contract between foreign corporation and one selling its newspapers, not as agent, but on his own account for purchase of newspapers on credit, contemplated a sale of the newspapers by a foreign corporation from without the state, and did not constitute doing business within the state, under this section [Code 1942, § 5343]. Item Co. v. Shipp, 140 Miss. 699, 106 So. 437, 1925 Miss. LEXIS 305 (Miss. 1925).

Single transaction by foreign corporation is not doing business in state. Item Co. v. Shipp, 140 Miss. 699, 106 So. 437, 1925 Miss. LEXIS 305 (Miss. 1925).

Sale of motor trucks by order through agent of foreign corporation resident in state held interstate commerce. City Sales Agency, Inc. v. Smith, 126 Miss. 202, 88 So. 625, 1921 Miss. LEXIS 24 (Miss. 1921).

Failure of foreign corporation to comply with this section [Code 1942, § 5343] does not withdraw from it recognition of its status as a corporation. Springfield Grocery Co. v. Devitt, 126 Miss. 169, 88 So. 497, 1921 Miss. LEXIS 12 (Miss. 1921).

A contract, whereby a foreign corporation purchased cotton seed “F.O.B. Como, Miss., mill weights to govern,” for shipment to the foreign state, where the mills were located and where the contract was required to be approved, held to be an interstate transaction, and corporation could recover for its breach in Mississippi without complying with this section [Code 1942, § 5343]. Union Cotton Oil Co. v. Patterson, 116 Miss. 802, 77 So. 795, 1917 Miss. LEXIS 360 (Miss. 1917).

Foreign corporation which had not complied with this section [Code 1942, § 5343] could not enforce note given by citizen for a debt due it in the courts of this state. Quartette Music Co. v. Haygood, 108 Miss. 755, 67 So. 211, 1914 Miss. LEXIS 271 (Miss. 1914).

36 Am. Jur. 2d, Foreign Corporations §§ 174,
205,
220 et seq.